Utah statutes.
75-5-211.   Proceedings subsequent to appointment -- Venue.

(1)  The court where the ward resides has concurrent jurisdiction with the court which appointed the guardian, or in which acceptance of an appointment by will or written instrument was filed, over resignation, removal, accounting, and other proceedings relating to the guardianship.

(2)  If the court located where the ward resides is not the court in which acceptance of appointment is filed, the court in which proceedings subsequent to appointment are commenced shall in all appropriate cases notify the other court, in this or another state, and after consultation with that court determine whether to retain jurisdiction or transfer the proceedings to the other court, whichever is in the best interest of the ward.  A copy of any order accepting a resignation or removing a guardian shall be sent to the court in which acceptance of appointment is filed.



Amended by Chapter 41, 1985 General Session

